North Dakota, session 69, HB1075.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new subdivision to subsection 2 of section 12-60-24 of the North Dakota Century
Code is created and enacted as follows:
The department of emergency services for a final employment applicant under chapter
37 - 17.1 .
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 37-17.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Criminal history record checks.
The department of emergency services may require a final applicant for employment to submit to
statewide and nationwide criminal history record checks. The nationwide criminal history record check
must be conducted in the manner provided by section 12 - 60 - 24 .

H. B. NO. 1075 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1075.
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State